Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.010

Legal aid defined.

Legal aid is the rendition, without compensation, of professional services by an active member of the Washington State Bar Association to or for any indigent person unable to pay a reasonable attorney's fee determined in accordance with the established code of legal ethics.

[ 1939 c 93 s 1; RRS s 10007-201. Formerly RCW 74.36.010.]